Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 8. Liens on Animals

§ 2071.
Liens for service of stallions.

Colts foaled in this State and the mare producing the same shall be subject to a lien to secure the payment of the service fee of the stallion.
Such lien shall continue in force until the colt is eight months old and may be enforced by attachment of such colt or mare at any time after the colt is four months old.
Such lien shall take precedence of any other claim upon such colt, subject to the conditions of sections 2072-2074 of this title.

§ 2072.
Filing of statement claiming lien.

On or before April 1, or within 30 days after such stallion is brought into such town, the owner or manager of the stallion shall annually file in the office of the clerk of the town where such stallion is kept a declaration of an intention to claim such lien and a statement containing the name and age of such stallion, his pedigree for two generations, if known, and the terms of service.
A copy of such statement shall be furnished the owner of each mare served and all bills or posters advertising such stallion shall contain a copy of such statement.

§ 2073.
False statements in claim of lien.

If the owner or manager in such statement makes a false representation regarding the pedigree of such stallion, the lien for such service shall be discharged and the service fee thereon secured shall be forfeited.

§ 2074.
Penalty for fraudulent sale of mare.

When the owner or manager of a stallion has complied with the requirements of section 2072 of this title, if the owner or person in whose name a mare has been mated with such stallion for breeding purposes disposes of such mare by sale or otherwise before foaling time without first settling with the owner or manager for the service of the stallion, or within 10 days after the disposal of the mare, he or she shall be subject to the same penalties that he or she would be for disposing of a colt encumbered by a lien.
If such mare is returned for trial to the stallion after three weeks from the date of the last service and found not to have become pregnant and is not again served during that breeding season, the provisions of this section shall not apply to the disposal of such mare.

§ 2075.
Lien for keeping or pasturing animals.

A person to whom charges are due for pasturing, boarding, or keeping domestic animals placed with the consent of the owner thereof in his or her care, if the charges become due while such animals remain in his or her possession, may retain the same until such charges are paid.
After 30 days from the time the charges become due, he or she may sell such animals in the manner provided for the sale of property under a lien for repairs, if such charges remain unpaid.